Illinois, session 104th, HB1731.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the Estate Tax Inflation Law.  6    Section 5. The Illinois Estate and Generation-Skipping 7Transfer Tax Act is amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 8    (35 ILCS 405/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 405A-2)9    Sec. 2. Definitions. 10    "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by the 11Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 12Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 13services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 14average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 15    "Federal estate tax" means the tax due to the United 16States with respect to a taxable transfer under Chapter 11 of 17the Internal Revenue Code.18    "Federal generation-skipping transfer tax" means the tax 19due to the United States with respect to a taxable transfer 20under Chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code.21    "Federal return" means the federal estate tax return with 22respect to the federal estate tax and means the federal   HB1731- 2 -LRB104 10440 HLH 20515 b1generation-skipping transfer tax return with respect to the 2federal generation-skipping transfer tax.3    "Federal transfer tax" means the federal estate tax or the 4federal generation-skipping transfer tax.5    "Illinois deceased spousal exclusion amount" means the 6difference between (i) the applicable exclusion amount for the 7deceased spouse under this Act on the date of the deceased 8spouse's death and (ii) the amount with respect to which the 9tentative tax was determined under Section 2001 of the 10Internal Revenue Code on the estate of the deceased spouse. In 11no event may the Illinois deceased spousal exclusion amount be 12less than zero. 13    "Illinois estate tax" means the tax due to this State with 14respect to a taxable transfer.15    "Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax" means the tax 16due to this State with respect to a taxable transfer that gives 17rise to a federal generation-skipping transfer tax.18    "Illinois transfer tax" means the Illinois estate tax or 19the Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax.20    "Indexed exclusion amount means: 21        (1) for persons dying on or after January 1, 2026 and 22    dying before January 1, 2027, $5,300,000; and 23        (2) for persons dying on or after January 1, 2027, the 24    exclusion amount calculated under this paragraph (2) for 25    the calendar year in which the person dies; for each 26    calendar year that begins on or after January 1, 2027, the   HB1731- 3 -LRB104 10440 HLH 20515 b1    indexed exclusion amount for the subject calendar year 2    shall be the product generated by multiplying the indexed 3    exclusion amount for immediately preceding calendar year 4    by one plus the percentage increase, if any, in the 5    Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending on 6    September 30 of the immediately preceding calendar year. 7    "Internal Revenue Code" means, unless otherwise provided, 8the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to 9time.10    "Non-resident trust" means a trust that is not a resident 11of this State for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act, as 12amended from time to time.13    "Person" means and includes any individual, trust, estate, 14partnership, association, company or corporation.15    "Qualified heir" means a qualified heir as defined in 16Section 2032A(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.17    "Resident trust" means a trust that is a resident of this 18State for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act, as amended 19from time to time.20    "State" means any state, territory or possession of the 21United States and the District of Columbia.22    "State tax credit" means:23    (a) For persons dying on or after January 1, 2003 and 24through December 31, 2005, an amount equal to the full credit 25calculable under Section 2011 or Section 2604 of the Internal 26Revenue Code as the credit would have been computed and   HB1731- 4 -LRB104 10440 HLH 20515 b1allowed under the Internal Revenue Code as in effect on 2December 31, 2001, without the reduction in the State Death 3Tax Credit as provided in Section 2011(b)(2) or the 4termination of the State Death Tax Credit as provided in 5Section 2011(f) as enacted by the Economic Growth and Tax 6Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, but recognizing the 7increased applicable exclusion amount through December 31, 82005.9    (b) For persons dying after December 31, 2005 and on or 10before December 31, 2009, and for persons dying after December 1131, 2010, an amount equal to the full credit calculable under 12Section 2011 or 2604 of the Internal Revenue Code as the credit 13would have been computed and allowed under the Internal 14Revenue Code as in effect on December 31, 2001, without the 15reduction in the State Death Tax Credit as provided in Section 162011(b)(2) or the termination of the State Death Tax Credit as 17provided in Section 2011(f) as enacted by the Economic Growth 18and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, but with the 19following modifications: 20        (1) the exclusion amount shall be: recognizing the 21    exclusion amount of only (i) 22            (A) $2,000,000 for persons dying prior to January 23        1, 2012; , 24            (B) (ii) $3,500,000 for persons dying on or after 25        January 1, 2012 and prior to January 1, 2013; , and26            (C) (iii) $4,000,000 for persons dying on or after   HB1731- 5 -LRB104 10440 HLH 20515 b1        January 1, 2013 and prior to January 1, 2026; and 2            (D) for persons dying on or after January 1, 2026, 3        the indexed exclusion amount, plus any Illinois 4        deceased spousal exclusion amount allowed under 5        paragraph (2); , and 6        (2) for persons dying on or after January 1, 2026, if a 7    valid election has been made under subparagraph (A) of 8    paragraph (5) of subsection (c) of Section 2010 of the 9    Internal Revenue Code allowing the person to take into 10    account a federal deceased spousal unused exclusion amount 11    for the purposes of calculating the person's federal 12    estate tax, then the exclusion amount under paragraph (1) 13    shall include the Illinois deceased spousal unused 14    exclusion amount for the deceased spouse with respect to 15    whom the federal election was made; 16        (3) for persons dying on or after January 1, 2026, the 17    State Death Tax Credit shall be calculated only on the 18    portion of the decedent's adjusted taxable estate that 19    exceeds the exclusion amount determined under paragraph 20    (1); and 21        (4) the State tax credit shall be calculated with a 22    reduction to the adjusted taxable estate for any qualified 23    terminable interest property election as defined in 24    subsection (b-1) of this Section.25    (b-1) The person required to file the Illinois return may 26elect on a timely filed Illinois return a marital deduction   HB1731- 6 -LRB104 10440 HLH 20515 b1for qualified terminable interest property under Section 22056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of the 3Illinois estate tax that is separate and independent of any 4qualified terminable interest property election for federal 5estate tax purposes. For purposes of the Illinois estate tax, 6the inclusion of property in the gross estate of a surviving 7spouse is the same as under Section 2044 of the Internal 8Revenue Code. 9    In the case of any trust for which a State or federal 10qualified terminable interest property election is made, the 11trustee may not retain non-income producing assets for more 12than a reasonable amount of time without the consent of the 13surviving spouse. 14    "Taxable transfer" means an event that gives rise to a 15state tax credit, including any credit as a result of the 16imposition of an additional tax under Section 2032A(c) of the 17Internal Revenue Code.18    "Transferee" means a transferee within the meaning of 19Section 2603(a)(1) and Section 6901(h) of the Internal Revenue 20Code.21    "Transferred property" means: 22        (1) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring at 23    the death of an individual, the deceased individual's 24    gross estate as defined in Section 2031 of the Internal 25    Revenue Code. 26        (2) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring as a   HB1731- 7 -LRB104 10440 HLH 20515 b1    result of a taxable termination as defined in Section 2    2612(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable amount 3    determined under Section 2622(a) of the Internal Revenue 4    Code. 5        (3) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring as a 6    result of a taxable distribution as defined in Section 7    2612(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable amount 8    determined under Section 2621(a) of the Internal Revenue 9    Code. 10        (4) With respect to an event which causes the 11    imposition of an additional estate tax under Section 12    2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the qualified real 13    property that was disposed of or which ceased to be used 14    for the qualified use, within the meaning of Section 15    2032A(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.16    "Trust" includes a trust as defined in Section 2652(b)(1) 17of the Internal Revenue Code.18(Source: P.A. 96-789, eff. 9-8-09; 96-1496, eff. 1-13-11; 1997-636, eff. 6-1-12.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.